Massachusetts, session 194th, HD6233.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 35 of chapter 123 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “physician,” in line 23, the
following: – qualified psychologist licensed pursuant to sections 118 to 129, inclusive, of chapter
112, licensed independent clinical social worker licensed pursuant to sections 130 to 137,
inclusive, of said chapter 112,.
of 1